Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-407
Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance; how cited.

Sections 44-407 to 44-407.09 and 44-407.24 to 44-407.26 shall be known as the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance.

Laws 1943, c. 106, § 5, p. 363;

R.S.1943, § 44-407;

Laws 1965, c. 262, § 3, p. 736;

Laws 1979, LB 354, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 2.